Louisiana, session 2026, SB63.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:109.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§109.5. Construction of carbon dioxide pipelines prohibited
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person shall
construct a pipeline for the purpose, in whole or in part, of transporting carbon
dioxide within the boundaries of the following:
(1) Maurepas Swamp Wildlife Management Area.
(2) Joyce Wildlife Management Area.
(3) Manchac Wildlife Management Area.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-132 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 63